Washington statutes.
RCW 7.96.030

Scope.

(1) This chapter applies to any claim for relief, however characterized, for damages arising out of harm caused by the false content of a publication that is published on or after July 28, 2013.

(2) This chapter applies to all publications, including writings, broadcasts, oral communications, electronic transmissions, or other forms of transmitting information.

[ 2013 c 294 s 3.]